Maine, session 132, LD1531.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1909-C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 301, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1909-D is enacted to read:
§1909-D. Animal-drawn vehicles
1. Lights required at all times. An animal-drawn vehicle may not be operated on a
public way unless it is equipped with and displays, at all times, the following:
A. One yellow flashing lamp displaying yellow light that is visible from a distance of
not less than 1,000 feet and that is mounted in either of the following positions:
(1) On the top-most portion of the rear of the animal-drawn vehicle; or
(2) On the top of the animal-drawn vehicle; and
B. At least one of the following:
(1) A slow-moving vehicle emblem on the rear of the animal-drawn vehicle; or
(2) Microprism reflective tape that is visible from a distance of not less than 500
feet to the rear of the animal-drawn vehicle when illuminated by the low beams of
headlights.
2. Lights required when visibility is limited. An animal‑drawn vehicle may not be
operated on a public way unless it is equipped with and displays lights as described in
subsection 3 during the following times:
A. The time from sunset to sunrise;
B. At any other time when, due to insufficient natural light or unfavorable atmospheric
conditions, persons, vehicles and substantial objects on the public way are not
discernible at a distance of 1,000 feet ahead of the animal-drawn vehicle; and
C. At any time when the windshield wipers of a vehicle are required to be in use
because of precipitation on the windshield.
3. Light specifications. For purposes of subsection 2, lights on an animal-drawn
vehicle when visibility is limited must include:
A. At least one lamp displaying a white light that is visible from a distance of not less
than 1,000 feet to the front of the animal-drawn vehicle; and
B. Two lamps displaying red light that is visible from a distance of not less than 1,000
feet to the rear of the animal-drawn vehicle or, as an alternative, one lamp displaying
a red light that is visible from a distance of not less than 1,000 feet to the rear of the
animal-drawn vehicle and 2 red reflectors that are visible from all distances of 100 feet
to 600 feet to the rear of the animal-drawn vehicle when illuminated by the low beams
of headlights.
4. Exception. This section does not apply to the operator of animal-drawn agricultural
equipment that is not transporting any livestock or a person other than the operator, except
that animal-drawn agricultural equipment may not be operated on a public way unless it is
equipped with and displays at all times a slow-moving vehicle emblem. For purposes of
this subsection, "agricultural equipment" means equipment drawn by the power of an
animal that is used solely for agricultural purposes.
Page 1 - 132LR1580(01)

5. Rules. The Commissioner of Public Safety may adopt rules establishing standards
and specifications for lamps and microprism reflective tape required under this section and
for the position and mounting of the lamps and microprism reflective tape required by this
section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in
Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.